West Virginia, session 2026, HB4326.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 10. Authorization for Department of Commerce to promulgate legislative rules. §64-10-1. Office of Miners' Health, Safety, and Training. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on September 24, 2024, authorized under the authority of §22A-1-6 of this code, relating to the Office of Miners' Health, Safety, and Training (the submission and approval of a comprehensive Mine Safety Program for coal mining operations in the state of West Virginia, 56 CSR 08), is authorized.